South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3109.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 6, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-6-120.  Beginning January 1, 2026, an adult sixty-five years of age and younger whose income is at or below one hundred thirty-three percent of the federal poverty level, with a five percent income disregard, is eligible for Medicaid as provided for in the "Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act" (P.L. No. 111-148), and amendments to that act. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----